test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-iello_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - iello: # N_ODD_WG (with descriptive variant triggering VH)
    iello+N+Sg+Nom: iello
    iello+N+Sg+Gen: ielo
    iello+N+Sg+Acc: ielov
    iello+N+Sg+Ill: [ielloj, elluj]
    iello+N+Sg+Ine: ielon
    iello+N+Sg+Ela: [ielost, ielos]
    iello+N+Sg+Com: [ielojn, ielojna] # TT: ok? JW: valid for all Sg+Com
    iello+N+Pl+Nom: ielo
    iello+N+Pl+Gen: ieloj
    iello+N+Pl+Acc: ielojd
    iello+N+Pl+Ill: ielojda
    iello+N+Pl+Ine: ielojn
    iello+N+Pl+Ela: [ielojst, ielojs]
    iello+N+Pl+Com: [ieloj, ielojgum]
    iello+N+Ess: iellon
    iello+N+Abe: ielodak
